Maryland, session 2025, SB0304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
12–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore City.
12–1603.
(a) The alcoholic beverages districts described in this section at all times are
coterminous with the legislative districts in the Legislative Districting Plan of 2022.
– 1 –

Ch. 808 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the Board may not issue a
new license in:
(1) the 40th alcoholic beverages district;
(2) the 41st alcoholic beverages district;
(3) the 43rd alcoholic beverages district;
(4) the 44th alcoholic beverages district; and
(5) the 45th alcoholic beverages district.
(c) The Board may issue:
(2) SUBJECT TO ITEM (19) OF THIS SUBSECTION, a Class C beer, wine,
and liquor license in the 45th alcoholic beverages district;
(17) a Class A–7 beer, wine, and liquor license in the 1200 block of West
North Avenue in the 40th alcoholic beverages district, if:
(i) the applicant executes a memorandum of understanding with the
Penn North Community Association;
(ii) alcoholic beverages are sold only as part of a gift basket or floral
arrangement; and
(iii) the applicant does not hold or apply for a Class BWLT beer, wine,
and liquor (on–premises) tasting license; [and]
(18) a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license for a restaurant on the even
side of the 400 block of West 29th Street in the 40th alcoholic beverages district if:
(i) the applicant executes a memorandum of understanding with the
Greater Remington Improvement Association; and
(ii) the Board waives a minimum seating requirement under item
(1)(ii)2 of this subsection; AND
(19) A CLASS C BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE IN THE 400 BLOCK
OF EAST OLIVER STREET IN THE 45TH ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES DISTRICT, ONLY IF:
(I) THE APPLICANT DOES NOT CONVERT THE LICENSE TO A
DIFFERENT LICENSE CLASS;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 808
(II) ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE SERVED OUTDOORS ONLY TO
PATRONS SEATED AT TABLES OR STANDING IN A COURTYARD AREA;
(III) THE APPLICANT DOES NOT ALLOW THE OFF–PREMISES SALE
OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES;
(IV) ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES SALES BEGIN NOT EARLIER THAN
10 A.M.; AND
(V) THE APPLICANT EXECUTES A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH THE GREENMOUNT WEST COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION.
12–2004.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a holder of a Class A beer,
wine, and liquor license may sell beer, wine, and liquor:
(i) on Monday through Saturday:
1. from 9 a.m. to 10 p.m. in the area specified in the Park
Heights Master Plan adopted by the City in 2006; [and]
2. FROM 9 A.M. TO 10 P.M. IN AN AREA BOUNDED AS
FOLLOWS: FROM THE INTERSECTION OF BELAIR ROAD AND ANNTANA AVENUE,
SOUTHWEST ON BELAIR ROAD TO THE INTERSECTION OF BELAIR ROAD AND
FRANKFORD AVENUE, SOUTHEAST ON FRANKFORD AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION
OF FRANKFORD AVENUE AND SIPPLE AVENUE, WEST ON SIPPLE AVENUE TO THE
INTERSECTION OF SIPPLE AVENUE AND CRENSHAW AVENUE, SOUTHEAST ON
CRENSHAW AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION OF CRENSHAW AVENUE AND
GOODNOW ROAD, SOUTHEAST ON GOODNOW ROAD TO THE INTERSECTION OF
GOODNOW ROAD AND SINCLAIR LANE, NORTHEAST ON SINCLAIR LANE TO THE
INTERSECTION OF SINCLAIR LANE AND RADECKE AVENUE, WEST ON RADECKE
AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION OF RADECKE AVENUE AND ANNTANA AVENUE,
THEN NORTH ON ANNTANA AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION OF ANNTANA AVENUE
AND BELAIR ROAD; AND
3. from 6 a.m. to midnight in all other locations in the City;
and
(ii) on the Sundays that fall between Thanksgiving Day and New
Year’s Day, from 1 p.m. to 9 p.m., if, on or before September 30 of that year, the license
holder has paid a supplementary license fee of $120 for each Sunday the privilege is to be
exercised.
– 3 –

Ch. 808 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) In addition to the privileges specified under paragraph (1)(ii) of this
subsection, the license holder may sell beer, wine, and liquor for off–premises consumption
on two additional Sundays during the calendar year if the holder pays a license fee of $120
at least 2 weeks before each time the privilege is exercised.
(c) A holder of a Class B–D–7 beer, wine, and liquor license may sell beer, wine,
and liquor:
(1) from 9 a.m. to 9 p.m. in the area bounded by Liberty Heights Avenue,
Northern Parkway, Druid Park Drive, and Wabash Avenue;
(2) from 9 a.m. to 9 p.m. along the south side of Frederick Avenue between
South Augusta Avenue and South Loudon Avenue;
(3) from 9 a.m. to 10 p.m. in the area specified in the Park Heights Master
Plan adopted by the City in 2006; [and]
(4) from 9 a.m. to 10 p.m. in an area bounded as follows: from the
intersection of East North Avenue and Harford Avenue, southwest on Harford Avenue to
the intersection of Harford Avenue and North Central Avenue, south on North Central
Avenue to the intersection with East Monument Street, east on East Monument Street to
the intersection of East Monument Street and North Wolfe Street, south on North Wolfe
Street to the intersection of North Wolfe Street and McElderry Street, east on McElderry
Street to the intersection of McElderry Street and North Collington Avenue, south on North
Collington Avenue to the intersection of North Collington Avenue and East Fayette Street,
east on East Fayette Street to the intersection of East Fayette Street and North Lakewood
Avenue, north on North Lakewood Avenue to the intersection of North Lakewood Avenue
and East Monument Street, west on East Monument Street to the intersection of East
Monument Street and North Luzerne Avenue, north on North Luzerne Avenue to the
intersection of North Luzerne Avenue and East Federal Street, west on East Federal Street
to the intersection of East Federal Street and North Rose Street, north on North Rose Street
to the intersection of North Rose Street and East North Avenue, then west on East North
Avenue to the intersection of East North Avenue and Harford Avenue; [and]
(5) FROM 9 A.M. TO 10 P.M. IN AN AREA BOUNDED AS FOLLOWS: FROM
THE INTERSECTION OF BELAIR ROAD AND ANNTANA AVENUE, SOUTHWEST ON
BELAIR ROAD TO THE INTERSECTION OF BELAIR ROAD AND FRANKFORD AVENUE,
SOUTHEAST ON FRANKFORD AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION OF FRANKFORD
AVENUE AND SIPPLE AVENUE, WEST ON SIPPLE AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION OF
SIPPLE AVENUE AND CRENSHAW AVENUE, SOUTHEAST ON CRENSHAW AVENUE TO
THE INTERSECTION OF CRENSHAW AVENUE AND GOODNOW ROAD, SOUTHEAST ON
GOODNOW ROAD TO THE INTERSECTION OF GOODNOW ROAD AND SINCLAIR LANE,
NORTHEAST ON SINCLAIR LANE TO THE INTERSECTION OF SINCLAIR LANE AND
RADECKE AVENUE, WEST ON RADECKE AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION OF
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 808
RADECKE AVENUE AND ANNTANA AVENUE, THEN NORTH ON ANNTANA AVENUE TO
THE INTERSECTION OF ANNTANA AVENUE AND BELAIR ROAD; AND
(6) from 6 a.m. to 2 a.m. the following day in all other locations in the City.
12–2005.
(c) (1) This subsection does not apply to:
(i) a Class B beer and light wine license;
(ii) a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license;
(iii) a Class B–D–7 beer, wine, and liquor license;
(iv) a Class C beer and light wine license; and
(v) a Class C beer, wine, and liquor license.
(2) For a license holder in an area bounded by Liberty Heights Avenue,
Northern Parkway, Druid Park Drive, and Wabash Avenue, the hours of sale:
(i) may not begin before 9 a.m. or end after 10 p.m.; and
(ii) may not be extended if they begin later than 9 a.m. or end before
10 p.m.
(3) For a license holder in an area bounded as follows: from the intersection
of East North Avenue and Harford Avenue, southwest on Harford Avenue to the
intersection of Harford Avenue and North Central Avenue, south on North Central Avenue
to the intersection with East Monument Street, east on East Monument Street to the
intersection of East Monument Street and North Wolfe Street, south on North Wolfe Street
to the intersection of North Wolfe Street and McElderry Street, east on McElderry Street
to the intersection of McElderry Street and North Collington Avenue, south on North
Collington Avenue to the intersection of North Collington Avenue and East Fayette Street,
east on East Fayette Street to the intersection of East Fayette Street and North Lakewood
Avenue, north on North Lakewood Avenue to the intersection of North Lakewood Avenue
and East Monument Street, west on East Monument Street to the intersection of East
Monument Street and North Luzerne Avenue, north on North Luzerne Avenue to the
intersection of North Luzerne Avenue and East Federal Street, west on East Federal Street
to the intersection of East Federal Street and North Rose Street, north on North Rose Street
to the intersection of North Rose Street and East North Avenue, then west on East North
Avenue to the intersection of East North Avenue and Harford Avenue, the hours of sale:
(i) may not begin before 9 a.m. or end after 10 p.m.; and
– 5 –

Ch. 808 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) may not be extended if they begin later than 9 a.m. or end before
10 p.m.
(4) FOR A LICENSE HOLDER IN AN AREA BOUNDED AS FOLLOWS:
FROM THE INTERSECTION OF BELAIR ROAD AND ANNTANA AVENUE, SOUTHWEST
ON BELAIR ROAD TO THE INTERSECTION OF BELAIR ROAD AND FRANKFORD
AVENUE, SOUTHEAST ON FRANKFORD AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION OF
FRANKFORD AVENUE AND SIPPLE AVENUE, WEST ON SIPPLE AVENUE TO THE
INTERSECTION OF SIPPLE AVENUE AND CRENSHAW AVENUE, SOUTHEAST ON
CRENSHAW AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION OF CRENSHAW AVENUE AND
GOODNOW ROAD, SOUTHEAST ON GOODNOW ROAD TO THE INTERSECTION OF
GOODNOW ROAD AND SINCLAIR LANE, NORTHEAST ON SINCLAIR LANE TO THE
INTERSECTION OF SINCLAIR LANE AND RADECKE AVENUE, WEST ON RADECKE
AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION OF RADECKE AVENUE AND ANNTANA AVENUE,
THEN NORTH ON ANNTANA AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION OF ANNTANA AVENUE
AND BELAIR ROAD, THE HOURS OF SALE:
(I) MAY NOT BEGIN BEFORE 9 A.M. OR END AFTER 10 P.M.; AND
(II) MAY NOT BE EXTENDED IF THEY BEGIN LATER THAN 9 A.M.
OR END BEFORE 10 P.M.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 6 –